California statutes. Family Code
(d) There is a pending motion for reduction in support due to a reduction in income.

(e) Illness or disability.

(f) Unemployment.

(g) Serious adverse impact on the immediate family of the obligor-parent residing with the obligor-parent that outweighs the impact of denial of the motion or stopping the sale on obligee.

(h) Serious impairment of the ability of the obligor-parent to generate income.

(i) Other emergency conditions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4613.

The court shall not issue an order pursuant to this article unless the court determines that one or more of the following conditions exist:

(a) The obligor-parent is not receiving salary or wages subject to an assignment pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) and there is reason to believe that the obligor-parent has earned income from some source of employment.

(b) An assignment of a portion of salary or wages pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) would not be sufficient to meet the amount of the support obligation, for reasons other than a change of circumstances which would qualify for a reduction in the amount of child support ordered.

(c) The job history of the obligor-parent shows that an assignment of a portion of salary or wages pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200), would be difficult to enforce or would not be a practical means for securing the
 payment of the support obligation, due to circumstances including, but not limited to, multiple concurrent or consecutive employers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4614.

The designation of assets subject to an order pursuant to this article shall be based upon concern for maximizing the liquidity and ready conversion into cash of the deposited asset. In all instances, the assets shall include a sum of money up to or equal in value to one year of support payments or six thousand dollars ($6,000) whichever is less, or any other assets, personal or real, designated by the court which equal in value up to one year of payments for support of the child, or six thousand dollars ($6,000), whichever is less, subject to Section 703.070 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 146.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4615.

In lieu of depositing cash or other assets as provided in Section 4614, the obligor-parent may, if approved by the court, provide a performance bond secured by real property or other assets of the obligor-parent and equal in value to one year of payments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4616.

Upon deposit of an asset which is not readily convertible into money, the court may, after a hearing, order the sale of that asset and the deposit of the proceeds with the deposit holder. Not less than 20 days written notice of the hearing shall be served on the obligor-parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4617.

(a) If the asset ordered to be deposited is real property, the order shall be certified as an abstract of judgment in accordance with Section 674 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) A deposit of real property is made effective by recordation of the certified abstract with the county recorder.

(c) The deposited real property and the rights, benefits, and liabilities attached to that property shall continue in the possession of the legal owner.

(d) For purposes of Section 701.545 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the date of the issuance of the order to deposit assets shall be construed as the date notice of levy on an interest in real property was served on the judgment debtor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Ex Parte Restraining Orders [4620. - 4620.]

4620.

(a) During the pendency of a proceeding under this chapter, upon the application of either party in the manner provided by Part 4 (commencing with Section 240) of Division 2, the court may, without a hearing, issue ex parte orders restraining any person from transferring, encumbering, hypothecating, concealing, or in any way disposing of any property, real or personal, whether community, quasi-community, or separate, except in the usual course of business or for the necessities of life, and if the order is directed against a party, requiring the party to notify the other party of any proposed extraordinary expenditures and to account to the court for all such extraordinary expenditures.

(b) The matter shall be made returnable not later than 20 days, or if good cause appears to the court, 25 days from the date of the order at which time the ex parte order shall expire.

(c) The court, at the hearing, shall
 determine for which property the obligor-parent shall be required to report extraordinary expenditures and shall specify what is deemed an extraordinary expenditure for purposes of this subdivision.

(d) An order issued pursuant to this section after the hearing shall state on its face the date of expiration of the order, which shall expire in one year or upon deposit of assets or money pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4610), whichever first occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Use or Sale of Assets to Make Support Payments [4630. - 4632.]

4630.

(a) Upon an obligor-parent’s failure, within the time specified by the court, to make reasonable efforts to cure the default in child support payments or to comply with a court-approved payment plan, if payments continue in arrears, the deposit holder shall, not less than 25 days after providing the obligor-parent or parents with a written notice served personally or with return receipt requested, unless a motion or order to show cause has been filed to stop the use or sale, use the money or sell or otherwise process the deposited assets for an amount sufficient to pay the arrearage and the amount ordered by the court for the support currently due for the child for whom support may be ordered.

(b) Assets deposited pursuant to an order issued under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4610) shall be construed as being assets subject to levy pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part
 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The sale of assets shall be conducted in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 701.510) and Article 7 (commencing with Section 701.810) of Chapter 3 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The deposit holder may deduct from the deposited money the sum of one dollar ($1) for each payment made pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 147.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4631.

(a) An obligor-parent may file a motion to stop the use of the money or the sale of the asset under this article within 15 days after service of notice on the obligor-parent pursuant to Section 4630.

(b) The clerk of the court shall set the motion for hearing not less than 20 days after service of the notice of motion and the motion on the person or county officer to whom support has been ordered to have been paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4632.

An obligor-parent alleged to be in arrears under this article may use any ground set forth in Section 4612 as a basis for filing a motion under Section 4631 to stop a sale or use of assets under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Return of Assets of Obligor [4640. - 4641.]

4640.

The deposit holder shall return all assets subject to court order under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4610) to the obligor-parent when both of the following occur:

(a) One year has elapsed since the court issued the order described under Article 2 (commencing with Section 4610).

(b) The obligor-parent has made all support payments on time during that one-year period.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4641.

If the deposited asset is real property and the requirements of Section 4640 have been satisfied, the deposit holder shall do all of the following:

(a) Prepare a release in accordance with Section 697.370 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Request the clerk of the court where the order to deposit assets was made to certify the release.

(c) Record the certified release in the office of the county recorder where the certified abstract was recorded under Section 4617.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Child Support Delinquency Reporting [4700. - 4701.]

4700.

This chapter may be cited as the Child Support Delinquency Reporting Law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4701.

(a) The Department of Child Support Services shall administer a statewide automated system for the reporting of court-ordered child support obligations to credit reporting agencies.

(b) The department shall design and develop standards for the system in conjunction with representatives of the California Family Support Council and the credit reporting industry.

(c) The standards for the system shall be consistent with credit reporting industry standards and reporting format and with the department’s statewide central automated system for support enforcement.

(d) The standards shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Court-ordered child support obligations and delinquent payments, including amounts owed and by whom. The California local child support agencies, on a monthly basis, shall update this information, and then submit it to
 the department which, in turn, shall consolidate and transmit it to the credit reporting agencies.

(2) Before the initial reporting of a court-ordered child support obligation or a delinquent payment, the local child support agency shall attempt to notify the obligor parent of the proposed action and give 30 days to contest in writing the accuracy of the information, or to pay the arrearage, if any, in compliance with the due process requirements of the laws of this state.

(e) The department and the local child support agencies are responsible for the accuracy of information provided pursuant to this section, and the information shall be based upon the data available at the time the information is provided. Each of these organizations and the credit reporting agencies shall follow reasonable procedures to ensure maximum possible accuracy of the information provided. Neither the department, nor the local child support agencies are liable for any
 consequences of the failure of a parent to contest the accuracy of the information within the time allowed under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 48.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Civil Penalty for Child Support Delinquency [4720. - 4733.]

4720.

“Support” for the purposes of this chapter means support as defined in Section 150.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4721.

(a) This chapter applies only to installments of child support that are due on or after January 1, 1992.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the penalties provided under this chapter shall be applied in egregious instances of noncompliance with child support orders.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that for the purposes of this chapter, payments made through wage assignments are considered timely regardless of the date of receipt by the local child support agency or obligee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 49.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4722.

(a) Any person with a court order for child support, the payments on which are more than 30 days in arrears, may file and then serve a notice of delinquency, as described in this chapter.

(b) Except as provided in Section 4726, and subject to Section 4727, any amount of child support specified in a notice of delinquency that remains unpaid for more than 30 days after the notice of delinquency has been filed and served shall incur a penalty of 6 percent of the delinquent payment for each month that it remains unpaid, up to a maximum of 72 percent of the unpaid balance due.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4723.

(a) The notice of delinquency shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the support obligee.

(b) The notice of delinquency shall state all of the following:

(1) The amount that the child support obligor is in arrears.

(2) The installments of support due, the amounts, if any, that have been paid, and the balance due.

(3) That any unpaid installment of child support will incur a penalty of 6 percent of the unpaid support per month until paid, to a maximum of 72 percent of the original amount of the unpaid support, unless the support arrearage is paid within 30 days of the date of service of the notice of delinquency.

(c) In the absence of a protective order prohibiting the support obligor from knowing the whereabouts of the child or children for whom support is payable, or otherwise excusing the requirements of this
 subdivision, the notice of delinquency shall also include a current address and telephone number of all of the children for whom support is due and, if different from that of the support obligee, the address at which court papers may be served upon the support obligee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4724.

The notice of delinquency may be served personally or by certified mail or in any manner provided for service of summons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4725.

If the child support owed, or any arrearages, interest, or penalty, remains unpaid more than 30 days after serving the notice of delinquency, the support obligee may file a motion to obtain a judgment for the amount owed, which shall be enforceable in any manner provided by law for the enforcement of judgments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4726.

No penalties may be imposed pursuant to this chapter if, in the discretion of the court, all of the following conditions are met:

(a) Within a timely fashion after service of the notice of delinquency, the support obligor files and serves a motion to determine arrearages and to show cause why the penalties provided in this chapter should not be imposed.

(b) At the hearing on the motion filed by the support obligor, the court finds that the support obligor has proved any of the following:

(1) The child support payments were not 30 days in arrears as of the date of service of the notice of delinquency and are not in arrears as of the date of the hearing.

(2) The support obligor suffered serious illness, disability, or unemployment which substantially impaired the ability of the support obligor to comply fully with the support order and the support obligor has made every
 possible effort to comply with the support order.

(3) The support obligor is a public employee and for reasons relating to fiscal difficulties of the employing entity the obligor has not received a paycheck for 30 or more days.

(4) It would not be in the interests of justice to impose a penalty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4727.

Any penalty due under this chapter shall not be greater than 6 percent per month of the original amount of support arrearages or support installment, nor may the penalties on any arrearage amount or support installment exceed 72 percent of the original amount due, regardless of whether or not the installments have been listed on more than one notice of delinquency.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4728.

Penalties due pursuant to this chapter may be enforced by the issuance of a writ of execution in the same manner as a writ of execution may be issued for unpaid installments of child support, as described in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 5100), except that payment of penalties under this chapter may not take priority over payment of arrearages or current support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4729.

The local child support agency or any other agency providing support enforcement services pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act may not enforce child support obligations utilizing the penalties provided for by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 50.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4730.

At any hearing to set or modify the amount payable for the support of a child, the court shall not consider any penalties imposed under this chapter in determining the amount of current support to be paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 149.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4731.

A subsequent notice of delinquency may be served and filed at any time. The subsequent notice shall indicate those child support arrearages and ongoing installments that have been listed on a previous notice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4732.

The Judicial Council shall adopt forms or notices for the use of the procedures provided by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4733.

Penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the custodian of the child who is the subject of the child support judgment or order, whether or not the child is a recipient of public assistance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 150.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Enforcement by Writ of Execution [5100. - 5104.]

5100.

Notwithstanding Section 290, a child, family, or spousal support order may be enforced by a writ of execution or a notice of levy pursuant to Section 706.030 of the Code of Civil Procedure or Section 17522 of this code without prior court approval.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 54.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2060, an order for the payment of child, family, or spousal support may be enforced against an employee benefit plan regardless of whether the plan has been joined as a party to the proceeding in which the support order was obtained.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 697.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, an execution lien created by a levy on the judgment debtor’s right to payment of benefits from an employee benefit plan to enforce an order for the payment of child, family, or spousal support continues until the date the plan has withheld and paid over to the levying officer, as provided in Section 701.010 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the full amount specified in the notice of levy, unless the plan is directed to stop withholding and paying over before that time by court order or by the levying officer.

(c) A writ of execution pursuant to which a levy is made on the judgment debtor’s
 right to payment of benefits from an employee benefit plan under an order for the payment of child, family, or spousal support shall be returned not later than one year after the date the execution lien expires under subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

(a) The application for a writ of execution shall be accompanied by an affidavit stating the total amount due and unpaid that is authorized to be enforced pursuant to Sections 5100 to 5103, inclusive, on the date of the application.

(b) If interest on the overdue installments is sought, the affidavit shall state the total amount of the interest and the amount of each due and unpaid installment and the date it became due.

(c) The affidavit shall be filed in the action and a copy shall be attached to the writ of execution delivered to the levying officer. The levying officer shall serve the copy of the affidavit on the judgment debtor when the writ of execution is first served on the judgment debtor pursuant to a levy under the writ.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Earnings Assignment Order [5200. - 5604.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [5200. - 5220.]

5200.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.

“Arrearage” or “arrearages” is the amount necessary to satisfy a support judgment or order pursuant to Section 695.210 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

“Assignment order” has the same meaning as “earnings assignment order for support.”

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

“Due date of support payments” is the date specifically stated in the order of support or, if no date is stated in the support order, the last day of the month in which the support payment is to be paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

“Earnings,” to the extent that they are subject to an earnings assignment order for support under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, include:

(a) Wages, salary, bonus, money, and benefits described in Sections 704.110, 704.113, and 704.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) Payments due for services of independent contractors, interest, dividends, rents, royalties, residuals, patent rights, or mineral or other natural resource rights.

(c) Payments or credits due or becoming due as a result of written or oral contracts for services or sales whether denominated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise.

(d) Payments due for workers’ compensation temporary disability benefits.

(e) Payments due as a result of disability from benefits described in Section 704.130 of
 the Code of Civil Procedure.

(f) Any other payments or credits due or becoming due, regardless of source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5208.

(a) “Earnings assignment order for support” means an order that assigns to an obligee a portion of the earnings of a support obligor due or to become due in the future.

(b) Commencing January 1, 2000, all earnings assignment orders for support in any action in which child support or family support is ordered shall be issued on an “order/notice to withhold income for child support” mandated by Section 666 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5210.

“Employer” includes all of the following:

(a) A person for whom an individual performs services as an employee, as defined in Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) The United States government and any public entity as defined in Section 811.2 of the Government Code.

(c) Any person or entity paying earnings as defined under Section 5206.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5212.

“IV-D Case” means any case being established, modified, or enforced by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 654 of Title 42 of the United States Code (Section 454 of the Social Security Act).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 480, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5214.

“Obligee” or “assigned obligee” means either the person to whom support has been ordered to be paid, the local child support agency, or other person designated by the court to receive the payment. The local child support agency is the obligee for all Title IV-D cases as defined under Section 5212 or in which an application for services has been filed under Part D (commencing with Section 651) and Part E (commencing with Section 670) of Subchapter IV of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code (Title IV-D or IV-E of the Social Security Act).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 7.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5216.

“Obligor” means a person owing a duty of support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5220.

“Timely payment” means receipt of support payments by the obligee or assigned obligee within five days of the due date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [5230. - 5247.]

5230.

(a) When the court orders a party to pay an amount for support or orders a modification of the amount of support to be paid, the court shall include in its order an earnings assignment order for support that orders the employer of the obligor to pay to the obligee that portion of the obligor’s earnings due or to become due in the future as will be sufficient to pay an amount to cover both of the following:

(1) The amount ordered by the court for support.

(2) An amount which shall be ordered by the court to be paid toward the liquidation of any arrearage.

(b) An earnings assignment order for support shall be issued, and shall be effective and enforceable pursuant to Section 5231, notwithstanding the absence of the name, address, or other identifying information regarding the obligor’s employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 57.3.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.1.

(a) An earnings assignment or income withholding order for support issued by a court or administrative agency of another state is binding upon an employer of the obligor to the same extent as an earnings assignment order made by a court of this state.

(b) When an employer receives an earnings assignment order or an income withholding order for support from a court or administrative agency in another state, all of the provisions of this chapter shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5230.5.

Any obligee alleging arrearages in child support shall specify the amount thereof under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5231.

Unless stayed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5260), an assignment order is effective and binding upon any existing or future employer of the obligor upon whom a copy of the order is served in compliance with Sections 5232 and 5233, notwithstanding the absence of the name, address, or other identifying information regarding the obligor’s employer, or the inclusion of incorrect information regarding the support obligor’s employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 57.5.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5232.

Service on an employer of an assignment order may be made by first-class mail in the manner prescribed in Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The obligee shall serve the documents specified in Section 5234.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5233.

Unless the order states a later date, beginning as soon as possible after service of the order on the employer but not later than 10 days after service of the order on the employer, the employer shall commence withholding pursuant to the assignment order from all earnings payable to the employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5234.

Within 10 days of service of an assignment order or an order/notice to withhold income for child support on an employer, the employer shall deliver both of the following to the obligor:

(a) A copy of the assignment order or the order/notice to withhold income for child support.

(b) A written statement of the obligor’s rights under the law to seek to quash, modify, or stay service of the earnings assignment order, together with a blank form that the obligor can file with the court to request a hearing to quash, modify, or stay service of the earnings assignment order with instructions on how to file the form and obtain a hearing date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 480, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5235.

(a) The employer shall continue to withhold and forward support as required by the assignment order until served with notice terminating the assignment order. If an employer withholds support as required by the assignment order, the obligor shall not be held in contempt or subject to criminal prosecution for nonpayment of the support that was withheld by the employer but not received by the obligee. If the employer withheld the support but failed to forward the payments to the obligee, the employer shall be liable for the payments, including interest, as provided in Section 5241.

(b) Within 10 days of service of a substitution of payee on the employer, the employer shall forward all subsequent support to the governmental entity or other payee that sent the substitution.

(c) The employer shall
 send the amounts withheld to the obligee within the timeframe specified in federal law and shall report to the obligee the date on which the amount was withheld from the obligor’s wages.

(d) The employer may deduct from the earnings of the employee the sum of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) for each payment made pursuant to the order. 

(e) Once the State Disbursement Unit as required by Section 17309 is operational, the employer shall send all earnings withheld pursuant to this chapter to the State Disbursement Unit instead of the obligee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 520, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5236.

The state agency or the local agency, designated to enforce support obligations as required by federal law, shall allow employers to simplify the process of assignment order withholding by forwarding, as ordered by the court, the amounts of support withheld under more than one order in a consolidated check, accompanied by an itemized accounting providing names, social security number or other identifying number, and the amount attributable to each obligor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5237.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), the obligee shall notify the employer of the obligor, by first-class mail, postage prepaid, of any change of address within a reasonable period of time after the change.

(b) Where payments have been ordered to be made to a county officer designated by the court, the obligee who is the parent, guardian, or other person entitled to receive payment through the designated county officer shall notify the designated county officer by first-class mail, postage prepaid, of any address change within a reasonable period of time after the change.

(c) If the obligee is receiving support payments from the State Disbursement Unit as required by Section 17309, the obligee shall notify the State Disbursement Unit instead of the employer of the obligor as
 provided in subdivision (a).

(d) (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), if the employer, designated county officer, or the State Disbursement Unit is unable to deliver payments under the assignment order for a period of six months due to the failure of the obligee to notify the employer, designated county officer, or State Disbursement Unit, of a change of address, the employer, designated county officer, or State Disbursement Unit shall not make any further payments under the assignment order and shall return all undeliverable payments to the obligor.

(2) If payments are being directed to the State Disbursement Unit pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5235, but the case is not otherwise receiving services from the Title IV-D agency, and the State Disbursement Unit is unable to deliver payments under the assignment order for a period of 45 days due to the failure of the obligee to notify the employer, designated county
 officer, or State Disbursement Unit of a change of address, the Title IV-D agency shall take the following actions:

(A) Immediately return the undeliverable payments to the obligor if the obligee cannot be located.

(B) Notify the employer to suspend withholding pursuant to the wage assignment until the employer or Title IV-D agency is notified of the obligee’s whereabouts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 806, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5238.

(a) Where an assignment order or assignment orders include both current support and payments towards the liquidation of arrearages, priority shall be given first to the current child support obligation, then the current spousal support obligation, and thereafter to the liquidation of child and then spousal support arrearages.

(b) Where there are multiple assignment orders for the same employee, the employer shall prorate the withheld payments as follows:

(1) If the obligor has more than one assignment for support, the employer shall add together the amount of support due for each assignment.

(2) If 50 percent of the obligor’s net disposable earnings will not pay in full all of the assignments for support, the employer shall prorate it first among all of the current support assignments in the same proportion that each assignment bears to the total current support owed.

(3) The employer shall apply any remainder to the assignments for arrearage support in the same proportion that each assignment bears to the total arrearage owed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5239.

Arrearages of support payments shall be computed on the basis of the payments owed and unpaid on the date that the obligor has been given notice of the assignment order as required by Section 5234.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5240.

(a) Upon the filing and service of a motion and a notice of motion by the obligor, the court shall terminate the service of an assignment order if past due support has been paid in full, including any interest due, and if any of the following conditions exist:

(1) With regard to orders for spousal support, the death or remarriage of the spouse to whom support is owed.

(2) With regard to orders for child support, the death or emancipation of the child for whom support is owed.

(3) The court determines that there is good cause, as defined in Section 5260, to
 terminate the assignment order. This subdivision does not apply if there has been more than one application for an assignment order.

(4) The obligor meets the conditions of an alternative arrangement specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 5260, and a wage assignment has not been previously terminated and subsequently initiated.

(5) There is no longer a current order for support.

(6) The termination of the stay of an assignment order under Section 5261 was improper, but only if that termination was based upon the obligor’s failure to make timely support payments as described in subdivision (b) of Section 5261.

(7) The employer or agency designated to provide services under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act or the State Disbursement
 Unit is unable to deliver payment for a period of six months due to the failure of the obligee to notify that employer or agency or the State Disbursement Unit of a change in the obligee’s address.

(b) In lieu of filing and serving a motion and a notice of motion pursuant to subdivision (a), an obligor may request ex parte relief, except ex parte relief shall not be available in the circumstances described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 77, Sec. 1.   (AB 1727)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

5241.

(a) An employer who willfully fails to withhold and forward support pursuant to a currently valid assignment order entered and served upon the employer pursuant to this chapter is liable to the obligee for the amount of support not withheld, forwarded, or otherwise paid to the obligee, including any interest thereon.

(b) If an employer withholds support as required by the assignment order, the obligor shall not be held in contempt or subject to criminal prosecution for nonpayment of the support that was withheld by the employer but not received by the obligee. In addition, the employer is liable to the obligee for any interest incurred as a result of the employer’s failure to timely forward the withheld support pursuant to an assignment earnings order.

(c) In addition to any other penalty or liability provided by law, willful failure by an employer to comply with an assignment order is punishable as a
 contempt pursuant to Section 1218 of the Code of Civil Procedure.
